Utah statutes.
31A-3-103.   Fees.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "services" means functions that are reasonable and necessary to enable the commissioner to perform the duties imposed by this title including:

(a)  issuing or renewing a license or certificate of authority;

(b)  filing a policy form;

(c)  reporting a producer appointment or termination; and

(d)  filing an annual statement.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided by this title:

(a)  the commissioner may set and collect a fee for services provided by the commissioner;

(b)  a fee related to the renewal of a license may be imposed no more frequently than once each year; and

(c)  a fee charged by the commissioner shall be set in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.

(3)  Except as otherwise provided in this title, a fee established pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the General Fund for appropriation by the Legislature.

(4) (a)  The commissioner shall publish a schedule of fees established pursuant to this section.

(b)  The commissioner shall, by rule, establish the deadlines for payment of a fee established pursuant to this section.

